Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 10.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1010
Entitlement period, defined.

Entitlement period
means the year during which the required increases in employment and investment
were met or exceeded and each year thereafter until the end of the ninth year
following the year of application.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 10.